Missouri, session 2026, HB2346.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 347.048, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 347.048, to read as follows:
347.048. 1. (1) Any limited liability company that owns and rents or leases real
property, or owns unoccupied real property, located within:
(a) Any home rule city with a population of more than four hundred thousand
inhabitants which is located in more than one county;
(b) Any home rule city with more than one hundred sixteen thousand but fewer than
one hundred fifty-five thousand inhabitants; [or]
(c) Any home rule city with more than seventy-one thousand but fewer than seventy-
nine thousand inhabitants; or
(d) Any county with more than one million inhabitants

shall file with that city's or county'sclerk an affidavit listing the name and street address of at
least one natural person who has management control and responsibility for the real property
owned and leased or rented by the limited liability company, or owned by the limited liability
company and unoccupied.
(2) Within thirty days following the cessation of management control and
responsibility of any natural person named in an affidavit described in this section, the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2346 2
limited liability company shall file a successor affidavit listing the name and street address of
a natural person successor.
2. No limited liability company shall be charged a fee for filing an affidavit or
successor affidavit required under this section.
3. If a limited liability company required by this section to file an affidavit or a
successor affidavit fails or refuses to file such completed affidavit with the appropriate clerk,
any person who is adversely affected by the failure or refusal, the county, or the home rule
city may petition the circuit court in the county where the property is located to direct the
execution and filing of such document.
✔